Massachusetts, session 194th, H1040.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Whereas, the use of tire-derived materials, including but not limited to tire crumb rubber,
ground tire rubber, shredded tires, rubberized asphalt, pour-in-place surfacing, recycled tire chips
and tire-derived aggregates in playgrounds, playing fields, and landscaping has raised concerns
about potential health and environmental hazards;
Therefore, be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives of the
Commonwealth of Massachusetts in General Court assembled, and by the authority of the same,
as follows:
Section 1. For the purposes of this act "Tire-derived materials" shall mean any material
derived from the processing of discarded tires, including but not limited to: tire crumb rubber,
ground tire rubber, shredded tires, rubberized asphalt, recycled tire chips, and tire-derived
aggregates.
of 2

"Playground" shall mean any area designed for children's play, including but not limited
to: Playgrounds in schools, parks, and residential areas; playgrounds in childcare facilities and
early childhood education centers;
"Playing field" shall mean any area used for athletic activities, including but not limited
to: sports fields for baseball, soccer, football, and other sports.
Section 2. No person shall install, construct, or maintain any playground or playing field
surface that contains tire-derived materials. This prohibition shall apply to both new and existing
playgrounds and playing fields.
Section 3. This act shall not apply to existing playground or playing field surfaces that
were installed prior to the effective date of this act.
Section 4. The Department of Environmental Protection shall be responsible for
enforcing the provisions of this act. The Department of Public Health] shall provide guidance
and recommendations regarding safe surfacing materials for playgrounds and playing fields.
Section 5. If any provision of this act or its application to any person or circumstance is
held to be invalid, such invalidity shall not affect other provisions or applications 1 of this act
which can be given effect without the invalid provision or application.
of 2